Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0741.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 14p. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 482 to 499 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 482.44 Property H Bills of lading â issuance for goods not received 5 482.46 Property H Bills of lading â issuance of duplicate negotiable bill with intent to defraud 5 482.48 Property H Bills of lading â negotiation when goods not in carriers' possession 5 482.49 Property H Bills of lading â inducing carrier to issue when goods have not been received 5 482.50 Property H Bills of lading â issuance of non-negotiable bill not so marked 5 487.1042(1) Pub trst E Money transmission services act â intentionally making a false statement, misrepresentation, or certification in a record or document 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 487.1042(2) Pub trst E Criminal fraud in the conduct of money transmission services business 5 487.1042(3) Pub trst E Money transmission services act license violation 5 487.1505(6) Pub trst E BIDCO act â knowingly receiving money or property at an interest rate exceeding 25% 5 492.137(a) Pub trst H Installment sales of motor vehicles 3 492.137a Pub trst F Installment sales of motor vehicles â acting without installment seller or sales finance company license 3 493.56a(13) Pub trst C False statement in reports â secondary mortgage 15 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 739 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.